src/fst/phonology.twolc
Vx:0  <=> :Consonant ( J1:0 ) _ %> PlSV:Vy Null* %{s%}:0 %{i%}:0 %{d%}:0 ;
          :Consonant ( J1:0 ) _ %> PlSV:0 Null* Vy ;                          ! osil
     where Vx in (a a a i)
           Vy in (i u e e)
     matched;

! lexical: m a j a > {pl.u} {stemill} > {s} {i} {d}
! surface: m a j 0 >    u       0     >  0   0   0
! lexical: o s a > {pl.i} {stemill} {W} > i > l
! surface: o s 0 >    0       0      0  > i > l 

! --------------
! 2. singular illative: -sse vs stem grade strengthening
!
! bisyllabic vowel-ending words may have a stem illative (also called as short illative) 
! but it is exceptional, and actually usable only for frequently occurring words.
! thus it has to be indicated in a stem lexicon with %{stemill%}
! (the same applies to exceptional words whose short illative is without stem gradation (põrgu; Kunda) ) 
! 
! lagi-laesse/lakke, keel-keelesse/keelde
! co-play of xxx rules with stem lex info for lagi, nimi, sõda; Riia, Kunda, ...

! ------
! general relations between short illative and stem grade

"weak grade is incompatible with exceptional stem (aka short) illative"
%{W%}:0       /<=  _ Any* %{s%}:0 %{s%}:0 %{e%}:0  ;    

"(extra) strong grade is incompatible with sse-illative"
%{S%}:0       /<=  _ Any* %{s%}:s %{s%}:s %{e%}:e  ;      


!------- short illative stem generation
! the rules are hard-wired to %{S%}: 

"short illative strong stem generation: weak stop cannot remain weak"
Cx:Cy /<=  _ NullNoTrigger* :Vowel NullNoTrigger* %{S%}: ;
     where Cx in ( g b d G1 B1 B2 D1 ) 
           Cy in ( g b d  g  b  b  d )
     matched ;

"short illative strong stem generation: consonant doubling"

0:Cy  <=>  ShortSyll NullNoTrigger* _ Cx:Cy NullNoTrigger* :Vowel NullNoTrigger* %{S%}: ; ! majja
     where Cx in ( l m M1 n r v j h s g b d k p t G1 B1 B2 D1 ) 
           Cy in ( l m  m n r v j h s k p t k p t  k  p  p  t )
     matched ;

! lexical: t u 0 B1 a > {pl.e} {stemill} {S} > {s} {s} {e}
! surface: t u p  p a 0    0       0      0  >  0   0   0 
! lexical: l a 0 G1 {stemill} e  {S} > {s} {s} {e}
! surface: l a k  k     0     e   0  >  0   0   0
! s õ J1 0 D1 a
! s õ  0 t  t a

! this rule complements the rule for consonant doubling
"short illative strong stem generation: g b d to k p t"

Cx:Cy <=>  0:Cy _ ;
     where Cx in ( g b d ) 
           Cy in ( k p t )
     matched ;

! s a 0 b a > {pl.u} {rare} {stemill} {S} > {s} {s} {e}
! s a p p a >    0     0         0     0  0  0   0   0

! the context is too specific; this is just to avoid twol warning messages about conflicting => contexts
! (the StrongGrade trigger alone should be sufficient as context)
"short illative strong stem generation: lexically determined stop"

Cx:Cy <=>  _ (:Cy | j) NullNoTrigger* :Vowel NullNoTrigger* %{S%}: ;
     where Cx in ( B2 G3 D3 G4 B4 D4) 
           Cy in (  p  g  d  k  p  t)
     matched ;

! lexical: A B4 j a {stemill} {S} > {s} {s} {e}
! surface: A  p j a     0      0  >  0   0   0
! lexical: R a n n D3 u {stemill} {S} > {s} {s} {e}
! surface: R a n 0  d u     0      0  >  0   0   0
! lexical: L e e D4 u {stemill} {S} > {s} {s} {e}
! surface: L e e  t u     0      0  >  0   0   0




! ------
! we (mis)use 2-level formalism to prune spurious branches that emerge from continuation lexicons
!
! usage tag %{rare%} is used for controlling paths
! that have the same lexical side, but different surface realisation
! so that the final lexical side has usage info indicated

! (the first lexical tag %{rare%} comes from the stem lexicon, the second from a continuation class lexicon,
! and it is the latter that is paired with the lexical side tag +Use/Rare)
! the combination of rules must ensure that the (non)existance of the latter is in harmony with the surface realisation of the affix, 
! given the semantics of the tags in the stem lexicon 

! -sse sg ill cannot be rare, if the stem lexicon tag says that short form is rare;
! -sse sg ill cannot be common, if there is no lexicon tag that would say that short form is rare;
! -sse sg ill cannot be rare, if the lexicon contains no tag to indicate that short form exists;

! short sg ill is rare, if the lexicon tag says it is rare;
! short sg ill is common, if there is no lexicon tag to indicate that it is rare
! note that {stemill} has to be indicated in lexicon; and weak grade is impossible

! short pl par is rare, if the lexicon tag says it is rare;
! short pl par is common, if there is no lexicon tag to indicate that it is rare;
! (short pl par is impossible without a plural stem vowel)

! -sid pl par cannot be rare, if the lexicon tag says that short form is rare;
! -sid pl par cannot be common, if there is no lexicon tag that would say that short form is rare;
! -sid pl par cannot be rare, if the lexicon contains no pl vowel to indicate short form ;

"usage tag may be in several places"
%{rare%}:0  =>  %{stemill%}: _ ;      ! stem illative usage tag in the lexicon follows the trigger
                       PlSV: _ ;      ! short pl partitive usage tag in the lexicon follows the plural stem vowel 
                     %{id%}: _ ;      ! -id plural partitive usage tag in the lexicon follows the trigger 
                %{stemill%}:  %{rare%}: Any* %{s%}:0 %{s%}:0 %{e%}:0  _  ;   ! nimme is rare
                %{stemill%}: \%{rare%}: Any* %{s%}:s %{s%}:s %{e%}:e  _  ;   ! majasse is rare
                  PlSV:stemV  %{rare%}: Any* %{s%}:0 %{i%}:0 %{d%}:0  _ ;   ! puudi is rare
                  PlSV:0     \%{rare%}: Any* %{s%}:s %{i%}:i %{d%}:d  _ ;   ! kaupasid is rare
                     %{id%}:  %{rare%}: Any* %{s%}:0 i d _  ;   ! esseid is rare
                     %{id%}: \%{rare%}: Any* %{s%}:s i d _  ;   ! puusid is rare


"long plural partitive cannot be common if the word already has a common short plural partitive"
%{s%}:s    /<= PlSV:0 \%{rare%}: Any* _ %{i%}:i %{d%}:d \%{rare%}: ; 

"short plural partitive cannot be common if the lexicon tag says it is rare"
%{s%}:0    /<= PlSV:stemV %{rare%}: Any* _ %{i%}:0 %{d%}:0 \%{rare%}: ; 

! lexical: p u u d > {pl.i} {hyp} {sg.a} > {s} {i} {d} {rare}
! surface: p u u d >    i     0      0   >  0   0   0      0     
! lexical: p u u d > {pl.i} {hyp} {sg.a} > {s} {i} {d} WordEnd
! surface: p u u d >    i     0      0   >  0   0   0           FAIL
! lexical: k a u p > {pl.u}       {sg.a} > {s} {i} {d} {rare}
! surface: k a u p >    u            0   >  0   0   0      0    FAIL
! lexical: t ü n g                {sg.a} > {s} {i} {d}
! surface: t ü n g                   a   >  s   i   d           

! lexical: p u u d > {pl.i} {hyp} {sg.a} > {s} {i} {d} {rare}
! surface: p u u d >    0     0      a   >  s   i   d     0    FAIL
! lexical: k a u p > {pl.u}       {sg.a} > {s} {i} {d} WordEnd
! surface: k a u p >    0            a   >  s   i   d          FAIL
! lexical: t ü n g                {sg.a} > {s} {i} {d} {rare}
! surface: t ü n g                   a   >  s   i   d     0    FAIL

"-id plural partitive cannot be common if the lexicon tag says it is rare"
%{s%}:0  /<=  %{id%}: %{rare%}: Any* _ i d \%{rare%}:  ;

"-sid plural partitive cannot be common if the word has a common -id plural partitive"
%{s%}:s  /<= %{id%}: \%{rare%}: Any* _ i d \%{rare%}:  ;

! lexical: p u u     {id}        > {s} i d {rare}
! surface: p u u      0          >  s  i d   0
! lexical: g n u u               > {s} i d WordEnd
! surface: g n u u               >  s  i d 
! lexical: g n u u               > {s} i d {rare}
! surface: g n u u               >  s  i d    0      FAIL 
! lexical: e s s e e {id} {rare} > {s} i d {rare}
! surface: e s s e 0  0      0   >  0  i d   0 
! lexical: e s s e e {id} {rare} > {s} i d {rare}
! surface: e s s e e  0      0   >  s  i d    0      FAIL
! lexical: e s s e e {id} {rare} > {s} i d WordEnd    
! surface: e s s e 0  0      0   >  0  i d        FAIL
! lexical: e s s e e {id} {rare} > {s} i d WordEnd
! surface: e s s e e  0      0   >  s  i d      
! --------------

"long illative cannot be common if the word has a common short illative already"
%{s%}:s      /<= %{stemill%}: \%{rare%}: Any* _ %{s%}: %{e%}: \%{rare%}:  ;

"short illative cannot be common if the lexicon tag says it is rare"
%{s%}:0      /<= %{stemill%}: %{rare%}: Any* _ %{s%}: %{e%}: \%{rare%}:  ;

! majja is common, majasse is rare
! lexical: m a j 0 a > {pl.u} {stemill} {S} > {s} {s} {e}
! surface: m a j j a >    0       0      0  >  0   0   0
! lexical: m a j   a > {pl.u} {stemill} {W} > {s} {s} {e} {rare}
! surface: m a j   a >    0       0      0  >  s   s   s    0

! nimesse is common, nimme is rare
! lexical: n i m 0 {stemill} {rare} e {S} > {s} {s} {e} {rare} 
! surface: n i m m     0        0   e  0  >  0   0   0    0
! lexical: n i m   {stemill} {rare} e {W} > {s} {s} {e}
! surface: n i m       0        0   e  0  >  s   s   e  

! tuppa is common, toasse is rare
! lexical: t u B1 0 a > {pl.e} {stemill} {S} > {s} {s} {e}
! surface: t u  p p a >    0       0      0  >  0   0   0 
! lexical: t u B1   a > {pl.e} {stemill} {W} > {s} {s} {e} {rare}
! surface: t o  0   a >    0       0      0  >  s   s   e     0

! loppa is impossible, lobasse is common
! lexical: l o b a                       {W} > {s} {s} {e}
! surface: l o b a                        0  >  s   s   e

! ---------
! --------- orthography
! ---------

! Orthography: consonant (cluster) writing conventions
! NB! Foreign names may contain them, e.g. Uppsala, Mannheim
! Treffner, Gottlieb, Seattle
! 1) if a vowel is deleted, the resulting consonant cluster may have to be modified
! (note: no consonant deletion before particle -gi/ki)
! 2) in this treatment, some consonants have been written as double in the lexicon 
! because they are pronounced long;
! this violates Estonian orthography, and this rule sets them right again

"consonant de-doubling in consonant clusters (e.g. after vowel deletion)"

Cx:0 <=> :Cx _ [Null | SuffixBorder]+ [[:LowerCaseConsonant Any* Border] - [Gi Border]];
         :Cx _ [WS:stop] ;
      where Cx in (LowerCaseConsonant) ;

! lexical: s p i k k E2 r > i
! surface: s p i k 0  0 r > i 

! lexical: R a n n D3 u
! surface: R a n 0 d  u 

! this prohibits vasallik, which is good, but vasalllik is prohibited by the rule above anyway...
"no deletion in ll+lik"

l:0 /<= :l _ Null* » l ;

! g b d is written as k p t after voiceless consonants
! this rule is restricted to affixes, because foreign words have conventions
! that do not follow this rule (lesginka)
"gbd to kpt after voiceless consonants"

Cx:Cy  <=> :voiceless Null* SuffixBorder _ ;
       where Cx in (g b d)
             Cy in (k p t)
       matched;

! lexical: s e i s > g i
! surface: s e i s > k i

! lexical g b d -> k p t when following a voiceless consonant
"lexical level gbd to kpt when following a voiceless consonant"

Cx:Cy  <=>  :voiceless Null* _ ;
       where Cx in (G1 B1 D1)
             Cy in ( k  p  t)
       matched;

"-gu to -ku after a voiceless consonant"
G7:k   <=>  [ :voiceless - :k ] Null* _ ;

! lexical: s e i s > G7 u 
! surface: s e i s >  k u

"-da to -ta after s"
D7:t  <=> :s Null* SuffixBorder _ ;

! lexical: s e i s > D7 a 
! surface: s e i s >  t a

! Orthographical convention for recent loans (kabinet) and -ik suffix

"double k p t"

%{dbl%}:Cx  <=> :Cx _ AnyNoWeakTrigger* WordEnd ;
      where Cx in (k p t) ;

! lexical: k a b i n e t . > {pl.e} {sg.i}
! surface: k a b i n e t t >    0      i

! If a foreign word is pronounced not according to Estonian writing conventions (Braille - brai)
! then its inflectional ending is separated with an apostrophe (superscript 9) ’ 
! This applies even to Sg Gen: Braille’
! The only form without ’ is Sg Nom, so {no_apo} is a standard trigger in continuation lexicons
"No apostrophe"

%{apo%}:0  <=> _ %{no.apo%}: ;

! lexical: B r a i l l e {apo} {no_apo}
! surface: B r a i l l e   0      0     

! ------
! ------ historically motivated rules
! ------

! ------ rules operate on a small set of different words
! ------ rules for j
